Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4038.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section, “health care cost growth,” “payer” and
“provider” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 442.385.
(2) For a provider or payer that exceeds the health care cost growth target established
under ORS 442.386 during calendar years 2021 to 2035, the Oregon Health Authority may not
do any of the following before January 1, 2036:
(a) Analyze the cause for exceeding the health care cost growth target;
(b) Require the provider or payer to develop or undertake a performance improvement
plan; or
(c) Impose a financial penalty.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2036.
SECTION 3. Section 7, chapter 51, Oregon Laws 2021, is repealed.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 188